Utah statutes.
39-6-17.   Bad conduct discharge or dismissal -- Approval by governor.
(1)  A sentence imposing dismissal or bad conduct discharge against a member
of the National Guard who is not in federal service may not be executed until
it is approved by the governor.
(2)  A discharge or dismissal may not be imposed by any military court unless
a complete written record of the proceedings has been made and is available
for consideration of the military court.
